Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Miscellaneous Health Coverage Provisions

205.565.
Cabinet to recognize unique costs of pediatric teaching hospital.

For the purposes of this section, a “pediatric teaching hospital” is defined as an acute-care hospital as licensed under KRS Chapter 216B and which has designated and operates no less than one hundred fifty (150) beds for pediatric services and which is either operated by one (1) of the Commonwealth’s schools of medicine and which has a pediatric teaching program or which has an affiliation agreement for pediatric services, teaching, and research with a school of medicine for the Commonwealth.

For purposes of inpatient hospital reimbursement under the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall recognize the unique costs of any pediatric teaching hospital.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 246, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 426, § 200, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 242, effective June 20, 2005.

205.566.
Electronic medical record database.

To the extent allowable by federal law, any Medicaid-participating health care provider who provides services to any medical assistance recipient may, at the discretion of the health care provider, maintain in an electronic medical record database the medical record for each medical assistance recipient receiving services by the health care provider.
(1) (a)

To the extent allowable by federal law, any Medicaid-participating health care provider who provides services to any medical assistance recipient may, at the discretion of the health care provider, maintain in an electronic medical record database the medical record for each medical assistance recipient receiving services by the health care provider.

An electronic signature shall be accepted for any medical record maintained under paragraph (a) of this subsection.

Any electronic medical record database maintained under subsection (1) of this section shall be capable of printing a complete written medical record of each medical assistance recipient.

Any provider who maintains an electronic medical record database under subsection (1) of this section shall:

Notify the department of the existence of the electronic medical record database;

Certify that the electronic medical record database will be confidential and that patient privacy will be protected;

Institute best practices to prevent access to the medical record database by any person who would not otherwise be authorized to review or obtain a written version of the medical records; and

Institute the best practices to assure the security of the database.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 363, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

205.570.
Respective functions of departments of economic security and health — Staff assistance for council. [Repealed.]

205.575.
Hospital indigent care assurance program. [Repealed.]

205.576.
Assessment of cost-based providers — Use of assessments — Return to providers — Appeals. [Repealed.]

205.577.
Assessment of medical providers — Use of assessments — Return to providers — Appeals. [Repealed.]

205.578.
Legislative review of medicaid assessment improvement trust fund expenditure and transfers. [Repealed.]

205.580.
Respective functions of departments of economic security and health — Staff assistance for council. [Repealed.]

205.590.
Technical advisory committees.

The following technical advisory committees shall be established for the purpose of acting in an advisory capacity to the Advisory Council for Medical Assistance with respect to the administration of the medical assistance program and in performing the function of peer review:

A Technical Advisory Committee on Physician Services consisting of five (5) physicians appointed by the council of the Kentucky State Medical Association;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Hospital Care consisting of five (5) hospital administrators appointed by the board of trustees of the Kentucky Hospital Association;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Dental Care consisting of five (5) dentists appointed by the Kentucky Dental Association;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Nursing Service consisting of five (5) nurses appointed by the board of directors of the Kentucky State Association of Registered Nurses;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Nursing Home Care consisting of six (6) members of which five (5) members shall be appointed by the Kentucky Association of Health Care Facilities, and one (1) member shall be appointed by the Kentucky Association of Nonprofit Homes and Services for the Aging, Inc.;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Optometric Care consisting of five (5) members appointed by the Kentucky Optometric Association;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Podiatric Care consisting of five (5) podiatrists appointed by the Kentucky Podiatry Association;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Primary Care consisting of five (5) primary care providers, two (2) of whom shall represent licensed health maintenance organizations, appointed by the Governor, until such time as an association of primary care providers is established, whereafter the association shall appoint the members;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Home Health Care consisting of five (5) members appointed by the board of directors of the Kentucky Home Health Association;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Consumer Rights and Client Needs consisting of seven (7) members, with one (1) member to be appointed by each of the following organizations: the American Association of Retired Persons Kentucky, the Family Resource Youth Services Coalition of Kentucky, the Kentucky Association of Community Health Workers, the Kentucky Legal Services Corporation, the Arc of Kentucky, the Department of Public Advocacy, and the National Association of Social Workers-Kentucky Chapter;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Behavioral Health consisting of seven (7) members, with one (1) member to be appointed by each of the following organizations: the Kentucky Mental Health Coalition, the Kentucky Association of Regional Programs, the National Alliance on Mental Illness (NAMI) Kentucky, a statewide mental health consumer organization, the People Advocating Recovery (PAR), the Brain Injury Association of America-Kentucky Chapter, and the Kentucky Brain Injury Alliance;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Children’s Health consisting of ten (10) members, with one (1) member to be appointed by each of the following organizations: the Kentucky Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Kentucky PTA, the Kentucky Psychological Association, the Kentucky School Nurses Association, the Kentucky Association for Early Childhood Education, the Family Resource and Youth Services Coalition of Kentucky, the Kentucky Youth Advocates, the Kentucky Association of Hospice and Palliative Care, a parent of a child enrolled in Medicaid or the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program appointed by the Kentucky Head Start Association, and a pediatric dentist appointed by the Kentucky Dental Association;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities consisting of nine (9) members, one (1) of whom shall be a consumer who participates in a nonresidential community Medicaid waiver program, one (1) of whom shall be a consumer who participates in a residential community Medicaid waiver program, one (1) of whom shall be a consumer representative of a family member who participates in a community Medicaid waiver program, and one (1) of whom shall be a consumer representative of a family member who resides in an ICF/ID facility that accepts Medicaid payments, all of whom shall be appointed by the Governor; one (1) member shall be appointed by the Arc of Kentucky; one (1) member shall be appointed by the Commonwealth Council on Developmental Disabilities; one (1) member shall be appointed by the Kentucky Association of Homes and Services for the Aging; and two (2) members shall be appointed by the Kentucky Association of Private Providers, one (1) of whom shall be a nonprofit provider and one (1) of whom shall be a for-profit provider;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Therapy Services consisting of six (6) members, two (2) of whom shall be occupational therapists and shall be appointed by the Kentucky Occupational Therapists Association, two (2) of whom shall be physical therapists and shall be appointed by the Kentucky Physical Therapy Association, and two (2) of whom shall be speech therapists and shall be appointed by the Kentucky Speech-Language-Hearing Association;

A Technical Advisory Committee on Pharmacy consisting of seven (7) members, two (2) of whom shall be Kentucky licensed pharmacists who own fewer than ten (10) pharmacies in the Commonwealth and shall be appointed by the Kentucky Independent Pharmacy Alliance, two (2) of whom shall be Kentucky licensed pharmacists and shall be appointed by the Kentucky Pharmacy Association, and one (1) member to be appointed by each of the following organizations: the Kentucky Hospital Association, the Kentucky Primary Care Association, and the National Association of Chain Drug Stores; and

A Technical Advisory Committee on Persons Returning to Society from Incarceration consisting of twelve (12) members of whom:

One (1) shall be appointed by each of the following organizations: the Kentucky Jailers Association, the Kentucky Medical Association, the Kentucky Association of Nurse Practitioners and Nurse-Midwives, Community Action of Kentucky, the Homeless and Housing Coalition of Kentucky, the Kentucky Office of Drug Control Policy, a Kentucky civil legal aid program, the Kentucky Department of Corrections, the Kentucky Department of Public Advocacy, the Kentucky Association of Regional Programs, and the Kentucky Administrative Office of the Courts; and

One (1) formerly incarcerated individual who is a current or former Medicaid recipient shall be appointed by Mental Health America of Kentucky.

The members of the technical advisory committees shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified.

Each appointive member of a committee shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses in carrying out their duties with reimbursement for expenses being made in accordance with state regulations relating to travel reimbursement.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VII, § 11; 1970, ch. 78, § 4; 1972, ch. 256, § 18; 1974, ch. 225, § 4; 1976, ch. 119, § 2; 1978, ch. 36, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 248, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 91, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 259, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2011, ch. 55, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 146, § 63, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 28, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 11, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2020 ch. 70, § 7, effective March 27, 2020; 2021 ch. 11, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

205.591.
“Fair market value” of applicant’s property if used to determine eligibility.

If the Department for Medicaid Services considers the fair market value of an applicant’s property for purposes of determining eligibility, “fair market value” means:

An estimate of the value of an asset if sold at the prevailing price at the time it was actually transferred, based on:

The most recent certified assessed value of the property as listed by the local property valuation administrator; or

The professional opinion of an independent, licensed appraiser; or

The price brought on the property at a public auction conducted by a licensed auctioneer.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 138, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

205.592.
Eligibility of pregnant women and children up to age 1 to participate in Kentucky Medical Assistance Program.

Beginning October 1, 1990, pregnant women and children up to age one (1) shall be eligible for participation in the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program if:

They have family income up to but not exceeding one hundred and eighty-five percent (185%) of the nonfarm income official poverty guidelines as promulgated by the Department of Health and Human Services of the United States as revised annually; and

They are otherwise eligible for the program.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 482, § 9, effective July 13, 1990.

205.593.
Prohibition against health insurer’s considering individual’s eligibility for or receipt of medical assistance in enrollment or payment of benefits — Application of claims payment requirements to Medicaid services.

In enrolling an individual or making any payments for benefits to the individual or on the individual’s behalf, health insurers are prohibited from taking into account that the individual is eligible for or is provided medical assistance.

KRS 304.17A-700 to 304.17A-730 and KRS 205.593, 304.14-135, and 304.99-123 apply to any provider partnership, health maintenance organization, or other managed care organization under contract with the Department for Medicaid Services to manage care and process health care claims for services delivered to Medicaid recipients covered under Medicaid managed care.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 366, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 436, § 19, effective July 14, 2000.

205.594.
Health coverage for child under medical child support order — Duties of health insurers.

As used in KRS 205.593 to 205.598, the term “insurer” includes a group health plan, as defined in Section 607(1) of the Employment Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, a health maintenance organization, and an entity offering a health service benefit plan.

Health insurers shall be prohibited from denying enrollment of a child under the health coverage of the child’s parent on the grounds that:

The child was born out of wedlock;

The child is not claimed as a dependent on the parent’s federal income tax return; or

The child does not reside with the parent or in the health insurer’s area.

If a parent is required by a court or administrative order to provide health coverage for a child and the parent is eligible for family health coverage through an insurer, the insurer shall be required:

To permit the parent to enroll under the family coverage any child who is otherwise eligible for the coverage without regard to any enrollment season restrictions;

If a parent is enrolled but fails to make application to obtain coverage for the child, to enroll the child under family coverage upon application by the child’s other parent, custodial parent, or by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and

Not to disenroll, or eliminate coverage of, a child unless the insurer is provided satisfactory written evidence that:

A court or administrative order requiring coverage of the child is no longer in effect; or

The child is or will be enrolled in comparable health coverage through another insurer which will take effect not later than the effective date of the disenrollment.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 366, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 201, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 243, effective June 20, 2005.

205.595.
Health coverage for child under medical child support order — Duties of employers.

If a parent is required by a court or administrative order to provide health coverage for a child and the parent is eligible for family health coverage through an employer doing business in the Commonwealth, the employer is required:

To permit the parent to enroll under family coverage any child who is otherwise eligible for the coverage, without regard to any enrollment season restrictions;

In the case where the noncustodial parent provides health care coverage and changes employment, to accept a notice of transfer of the provision to enroll from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the custodial parent or the noncustodial parent, and to enroll the child in the noncustodial parent’s health care coverage, unless the noncustodial parent contests the notice pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B;

If a parent is enrolled but fails to make application to obtain coverage for the child, to enroll the child under family coverage upon application by the child’s other parent, custodial parent, or by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

Not to disenroll or eliminate coverage of a child unless:

The employer is provided satisfactory written evidence that a court or administrative order requiring coverage of the child is no longer in effect, or that the child is or will be enrolled in comparable health coverage which will take effect no later than the effective date of the disenrollment; or

The employer has eliminated family health coverage for all of its employees; and

To withhold from the employee’s compensation the employee’s share, if any, of premiums for health coverage, except that the amount withheld may not exceed the maximum amount permitted to be withheld under Section 303(b) of the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, and to pay the share of premiums to the insurer.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 366, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 255, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 202, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 244, effective June 20, 2005.

205.596.
Prohibition against health insurer’s imposing requirements on state agency assigned rights of individual eligible for medical assistance that are different from those applicable to agent or assignee of other covered individual.

Health insurers are prohibited from imposing requirements on a state agency which has been assigned the rights of an individual eligible for medical assistance and covered for health benefits from the insurer that are different from requirements applicable to an agent or assignee of any other individual covered.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 366, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

205.597.
Health coverage through insurer of noncustodial parent of child under medical child support order.

If a child has health coverage through the insurer of a noncustodial parent, the insurer is required:

To provide information to the custodial parent as necessary for the child to obtain benefits for the coverage;

To permit the custodial parent or provider, with the custodial parent’s approval, to submit claims for covered services without the approval of the noncustodial parent; and

To make payment on claims submitted in accordance with subsection (2) of this section directly to the custodial parent, the provider, or the Medical Assistance Program.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 366, § 5, effective July 15, 1994.

205.598.
Withholding of income and state tax refund of person required by court to provide cost of child’s health service — Priority of claims for child support over costs of reimbursement of child medical support.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall withhold the wages, salary, or other employment income of, and require withholding amounts from state tax refunds to, any person who:

Is required by court or administrative order to provide coverage of the costs of health services to a child who is eligible for medical assistance;

Has received payment from a third party for the costs of the services for the child; but

Has not used these payments to reimburse either the other parent or guardian of the child, or the provider of the services.

Any claims for current or past-due child support income shall take priority over the claims for the costs of reimbursing the Medical Assistance Program for child medical support.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 366, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 203, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 245, effective June 20, 2005.

205.600.
County medical review committees. [Repealed.]

205.604.
Authority of counties and cities to contract with hospitals. [Repealed.]

205.610.
Dedication of federal-state medical care fund. [Repealed.]

205.615.
Use of allowable Medicaid funding for trauma care costs.

It shall be a priority of the Department for Medicaid Services to use any additional funding allocated to the Medicaid program to provide annual supplemental payments to increase the percentage of cost covered by Medicaid reimbursement with the goal of covering full allowable costs for covered services provided to Medicaid patients by acute care hospitals that are verified as trauma centers under KRS 211.490 to 211.496 and to physicians who provide care to patients presenting in an emergency room of a verified trauma center.

History.
Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 25, § 5, effective July 15, 2008.

205.617.
Expansion of Medicaid coverage for screening and treatment of breast or cervical cancer or precancerous conditions — Short title.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall expand Medicaid coverage to offer benefits to uninsured women who:

Are under age sixty-five (65);

Are not otherwise eligible for Medicaid;

Have been screened for breast or cervical cancer or precancerous conditions, or any combination of these conditions, through the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s National Breast and Cervical Cancer Early Detection Program or through the Department for Public Health’s Women’s Cancer Screening Program;

Are in need of treatment for breast or cervical cancer or precancerous conditions, or any combination of these conditions, as a result of a diagnosis of those conditions in a program identified in paragraph (c) of this subsection;

Are not otherwise covered under creditable coverage, as defined in 42 U.S.C. sec. 300gg(c); and

Meet any other eligibility-required criteria established under the Federal Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Act of 2000.

No later than three (3) months after April 10, 2008, the department shall submit to the secretary of the United States Department for Health and Human Services a request for approval of a plan amendment to extend coverage as authorized under subsection (1) of this section.

Within three (3) months following receipt of federal approval of a plan amendment, the department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the requirements of this section. If federal approval has not been received within six (6) months after April 10, 2008, for the plan amendment, the department shall report the status of the request for approval and the steps being taken by the department to secure federal approval.

Medical assistance provided under the plan amendment shall be limited to medical assistance provided during the period in which a woman who meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section requires treatment for breast or cervical cancer or precancerous conditions, or any combination of these conditions. In the case of any covered woman whose medical assistance has been terminated due to a cure or remission of a condition diagnosed under subsection (1)(c) of this section, medical assistance shall be reinstituted for any subsequent periods of recurrence or metastasis or any future conditions establishing eligibility under subsection (1) of this section.

This section shall be known as the Kentucky Breast and Cervical Cancer Treatment Act of 2008.

History.
Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 63, § 1, effective April 10, 2008.

205.618.
Coverage for tobacco cessation medications and services.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department for Medicaid Services or a managed care organization contracted to provide Medicaid services shall, at a minimum, provide coverage for all United States Food and Drug Administration-approved tobacco cessation medications, all forms of tobacco cessation services recommended by the United States Preventive Services Task Force, including but not limited to individual, group, and telephone counseling, and any combination thereof.

The following conditions shall not be imposed on any tobacco cessation services provided pursuant to this section:

Counseling requirements for medication;

Limits on the duration of services, including but not limited to annual or lifetime limits on the number of covered attempts to quit; or

Copayments or other out-of-pocket cost sharing, including deductibles.

Utilization management requirements, including prior authorization and step therapy, shall not be imposed on any tobacco cessation services provided pursuant to this section, except in the following circumstances where prior authorization may be required:

For a treatment that exceeds the duration recommended by the most recently published United States Public Health Service clinical practice guidelines on treating tobacco use and dependence; or

For services associated with more than two (2) attempts to quit within a twelve (12) month period.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the Department for Medicaid Services or a managed care organization contracted to provide Medicaid services from providing coverage for tobacco cessation services in addition to those recommended or to deny coverage for services that are not recommended by the United States Preventive Services Task Force.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 49, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

205.619.
Medicaid plan amendment to permit establishing of Kentucky Long-Term Care Partnership Insurance Program.

By October 30, 2008, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall submit to the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services an amendment to the State Medicaid Plan to permit the establishment of a Kentucky Long-Term Care Partnership Insurance Program that provides for the disregard of any assets or resources in an amount equal to the insurance benefit payments made to or on behalf of an individual who is a beneficiary of the partnership insurance program that meets the requirements of KRS 304.14-640 and 304.14-642.

The secretary of the cabinet shall notify in writing the commissioner of the Department of Insurance and the co-chairs of the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare and the Interim Joint Committee on Banking and Insurance within two (2) business days of the submission of the plan amendment and of the receipt of the response by the federal agency.

Upon approval by the federal government of the state plan amendment, the Department for Medicaid Services, in conjunction with the Department of Insurance, shall establish the Kentucky Long-Term Care Partnership Insurance Program in accordance with KRS 304.14-640 and 304.14-642.

The department shall:

Provide consultation, information, and materials to the Department of Insurance to assist in the development and issuance of uniform training materials in accordance with KRS 304.14-642(4); and

Collaborate in the preparation of the report required in KRS 304.14-642(6).

History.
Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 16, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 303, effective July 15, 2010.

205.620.
Time of payment. [Repealed.]

205.621.
Increased reimbursement for Medicaid.

Reimbursement for physicians and dentists providing services to Medicaid recipients shall be increased to reflect budgeted provider profiles beginning October 1, 1990.

Beginning October 1, 1992, reimbursement to physicians and dentists shall be increased annually in increments which represent a minimum seventy-five percent (75%) of the most recently reported annual change in the consumer price index as computed by the United States Department of Labor.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 482, § 13, effective July 13, 1990.

205.622.
Billing of third party by vendor for medical services.

Prior to billing the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program, all participating vendors shall submit billings for medical services first to a third party when such vendor has knowledge that such third party may be liable for payment of the services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 252, § 3, effective July 15, 1980.

205.623.
Information on claims paid for insurance policyholders and dependents — Use of data — Confidentiality of information — Prohibited fees.

All health insurers and administrators as defined under KRS Chapter 304 shall provide upon request to the Department for Medicaid Services, by electronic means and in the format prescribed by the department, policy and coverage information and claims paid data on Medicaid-eligible policyholders and dependents. Any request from the department shall include a list of data elements that shall be included on the electronic file from the insurer or administrator.

All health insurers and administrators as defined under KRS Chapter 304 shall provide upon request to the department, by electronic means and in the format prescribed by the department, identifying information on all policyholders and dependents to match with the Medicaid management information system to determine which policyholders and dependents also participate in the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program. The identifying information shall include the name, address, date of birth, and Social Security number as these items appear in the companies’ files and as the department may require.

No health insurer or administrator shall be required to provide information under this section if doing so would violate any provision of federal law.

All information obtained by the department pursuant to this section shall be confidential and shall not be open for public inspection.

The department shall not be charged a fee by a third party for information requested under this section, nor shall the department be charged a fee by a third party for the processing and adjudication of the department’s claim for recovery, reclamation, or validation of eligibility.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 506, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 353, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 204, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 246, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 71, § 5, effective July 15, 2008.

205.624.
Assignment to cabinet by recipient of rights to third-party payments — Right of recovery by cabinet.

An applicant or recipient shall be deemed to have made to the cabinet an assignment of his rights to third-party payments to the extent of medical assistance paid on behalf of the recipient under Title XIX of the Social Security Act. The applicant or recipient shall be informed in writing by the cabinet of such assignment.

The cabinet shall have the right of recovery which a recipient may have for the cost of hospitalization, pharmaceutical services, physician services, nursing services, and other medical services not to exceed the amount of funds expended by the cabinet for such care and treatment of the recipient under the provisions of Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

If a payment for medical assistance is made, the cabinet, to enforce its right, may:

Intervene or join in an action or proceeding brought by the injured, diseased, or disabled person, the person’s guardian, personal representative, estate, dependents, or survivors against a third party who may be liable for the injury, disease, or disability, or against contractors, public or private, who may be liable to pay or provide medical care and services rendered to an injured, diseased, or disabled recipient, in state or federal court; or

Institute and prosecute legal proceedings against a third party who may be liable for the injury, disease, or disability, or against contractors, public or private, who may be liable to pay or provide medical care and services rendered to an injured, diseased, or disabled recipient, in state or federal court, either alone or in conjunction with the injured, diseased, or disabled person, the person’s guardian, personal representative, estate, dependents, or survivors; or

Institute the proceedings in its own name or in the name of the injured, diseased, or disabled person, the person’s guardian, personal representative, estate, dependents, or survivors.

The injured, diseased, or disabled person may proceed in his own name, collecting costs without the necessity of joining the cabinet or the Commonwealth as a named party, provided the injured, diseased, or disabled person shall notify the cabinet of the action or proceeding entered into upon commencement of the action or proceeding. The injured, diseased, or disabled person must notify the cabinet of any settlement or judgment of his or her claim.

In the case of an applicant for or recipient of medical assistance whose eligibility is based on deprivation of parental care or support due to absence of a parent from the home, the cabinet may:

Initiate a civil action or other legal proceedings to secure repayment of medical assistance expenditures for which the absent parent is liable; and

Provide for the payment of reasonable administrative costs incurred by such other state or county agency requested by the cabinet to assist in the enforcement of securing repayment from the absent parent.

Each insurer issuing policies or contracts under Subtitle 17, 18, 32, or 38 of KRS Chapter 304 shall cooperate fully with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or an authorized designee of the cabinet in order for the cabinet to comply with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 252, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 96, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 205, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 247, effective June 20, 2005.

205.626.
Time assignment becomes enforceable — Payment to cabinet — Attorney’s fees.

The assignment provided for by KRS 205.624 shall be binding and enforceable after the third parties have actual notice of the assignment. The third party shall be discharged from liability under the assignment when it makes payment to a vendor for medical care and services rendered on behalf of a recipient.

Any settlement, judgment, or award obtained by a recipient or the recipient’s legal representative against a third party is subject to the cabinet’s claim for reimbursement for medical assistance paid on behalf of the recipient.

The attorney may receive a percentage not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount paid to the cabinet that has been recovered in reimbursement from the third party. The amount paid to the cabinet shall be excluded by the attorney when computing the total amount recovered on behalf of the client and in final computation of the client’s bill.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 252, § 6, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 506, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

205.627.
Pro rata diminishment of cabinet’s subrogation claim for reimbursement. [Repealed.]

205.628.
Liability of recipient.

An applicant or recipient of medical assistance shall be liable to the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program for any payment received from a third party to the extent of medical assistance paid on the recipients’ behalf under Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 252, § 7, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 506, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

205.629.
Notification of cabinet in actions seeking recovery for recipient.

In any action seeking to recover damages on behalf of a recipient, the cabinet shall receive notice from the recipient’s attorney in the same manner as provided in KRS 411.188(2) for notifying parties with subrogation rights.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 506, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

205.630.
Prohibited activity by cabinet — Injunctive relief.

The cabinet is prohibited from collecting, attempting to collect, or threatening to collect moneys due from any individual person for services rendered at a cabinet facility as a means of coercing or attempting to coerce the person into removing any person for whom they are responsible from a cabinet facility, changing the level of care or treatment of the person or removing the person from one cabinet facility to another, or to a private facility.

Any person who believes that the cabinet is violating the provisions of this section may apply for injunctive relief to the Circuit Court where he resides, where the facility is located, where the patient resides, or to the Franklin Circuit Court.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 252, § 8, effective July 15, 1980.

205.631.
Life settlement proceeds for long-term care services not considered as resource or asset for Medicaid eligibility — Notice of exhaustion of proceeds — Medicaid and applied income payments to begin immediately upon exhaustion of life settlement proceeds — Administrative regulations.

To the extent allowable under state or federal law, the proceeds of a life settlement received pursuant to KRS 304.15-726 shall not be considered as a resource or asset in determining a Medicaid applicant’s or recipient’s eligibility for Medicaid and shall only be used as allowed for long-term-care services in accordance with KRS 304.15-726.
(1) (a)

To the extent allowable under state or federal law, the proceeds of a life settlement received pursuant to KRS 304.15-726 shall not be considered as a resource or asset in determining a Medicaid applicant’s or recipient’s eligibility for Medicaid and shall only be used as allowed for long-term-care services in accordance with KRS 304.15-726.

No state or federal Medicaid funds may be used for the recipient’s care until available proceeds from the life settlement are utilized for the recipient’s care, excluding the amount retained for final expenses in accordance with KRS 304.15-726.

The recipient, as defined in KRS 304.15-726, shall provide notice, in a manner prescribed by the cabinet, that the life settlement proceeds in the irrevocable account established pursuant to KRS 304.15-726 are exhausted or will become exhausted on a specified date.

The cabinet shall ensure that Medicaid and applied income payments shall begin on the day following exhaustion of the life settlement proceeds if notice is provided to the cabinet as required by subsection (1)(c) of this section.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations defining a service or support deemed a long-term-care service for the purposes of KRS 304.15-726. The cabinet shall promulgate an administrative regulation prescribing the manner in which a recipient, as defined in KRS 304.15-726, shall provide notice to the cabinet in accordance with subsection (1)(c) of this section.

The cabinet shall provide to all applicants as part of the application for enrollment in the Medicaid program:

Written notice of the options provided in KRS 304.15-726; and

Information about options that do not allow a life insurance policy to be considered as an asset or resource in determining eligibility for medical assistance.

The cabinet shall provide information about the options in KRS 304.15-726 to other state and local, public and private agencies and organizations in cooperation with one (1) or more nonprofit organizations, pursuant to an agreement between the state and each nonprofit organization. Costs for materials and distribution of information required by this subsection shall not be the responsibility of the state, unless required by law.

History.
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 60, § 2, effective July 15, 2014.